Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Chapter 06. Geothermal Resources.

Cross references. —

For declaration of legislative policy on geothermal resources, see § 1, ch. 175, SLA 1980, in the Temporary and Special Acts; for discovery and development of geothermal resources, see AS

38.05.181

.

Administrative Code. —

For geothermal drilling and conservation, see 11 AAC 87.

For geothermal resources, see 20 AAC 25, art. 7.

Collateral references. —

Leases, construction and application of Geothermal Steam Act of 1970 (30 USCS §§ 1001 et seq.), pertaining to leases of government lands for development of geothermal steam resources. 40 ALR Fed. 814.

Sec. 41.06.005.
Jurisdiction over geothermal resources.

The commission has jurisdiction under this chapter over geothermal wells to prevent waste, to protect correlative rights, and to ensure public safety.

The Department of Natural Resources has jurisdiction under this chapter over management of geothermal leases and units in the public interest and to effect development.

History.

(§ 3 ch 38 SLA 2010)

Sec. 41.06.010.
Waste prohibited; investigation.

The waste of geothermal resources in the state is prohibited. The commission may investigate to determine whether waste exists or is imminent, or whether other facts exist that justify or require action by the commission to prohibit waste.

History.

(§ 6 ch 175 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 38 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For drilling of geothermal wells, see 11 AAC 87, art. 3.

Sec. 41.06.020.
Authority of commission; application.

The commission has jurisdiction over all persons and property, public and private, necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter.

The authority of the commission applies to all land in the state lawfully subject to the police power of the state, including private land, municipal land, state land, land of the United States, and land subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, and to all land included in a voluntary cooperative or unit plan of development or operation entered into in accordance with AS

38.05.181

. When land that is subject to the commission’s authority is committed to a unit agreement involving land subject to federal jurisdiction, the operation of this chapter or a part of this chapter may be suspended if

the unit operations are regulated by the United States; and

the conservation of geothermal resources is accomplished under the unit agreement.

This chapter applies

to wells drilled in search of, in support of, or for the recovery or production of geothermal resources;

when a person engaged in drilling activity not otherwise subject to the provisions of this chapter encounters geothermal resources, fluid, or water of sufficient heat or pressure to constitute a threat to human life or health unless the drilling operation is subject to oil and gas drilling regulation under AS 31.05;

in areas and under conditions in which the commission determines that drilling may encounter geothermal resources, fluid, or water of sufficient heat or pressure to constitute a threat to human life or health.

To the extent the provisions of AS 31.05 do not conflict with the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of AS 31.05 are applicable to wells drilled in search of, in support of, or for the recovery or production of geothermal resources.

Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of the department

over geothermal resources under AS

38.05.181

; or

to approve and manage geothermal units or operations that include state land.

History.

(§ 6 ch 175 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 38 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For applicability, see 11 AAC 87, art. 1.

For exploratory operations, see 11 AAC 87, art. 2.

For drilling of geothermal wells, see 11 AAC 87, art. 3.

For production, see 11 AAC 87, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, repealed and reenacted this section.

Sec. 41.06.030.
Unitization.

The commissioner shall require the filing and approval of a plan of development and operation on a geothermal system that includes state land.

Lessees of all or part of a geothermal system that includes state land may enter into a unit agreement for cooperative development, with the approval of the commissioner. The commissioner may suspend or modify the approved development plan in accordance with the unit agreement.

If the owners of at least two-thirds of the leasehold interests in a geothermal system ratify a unit agreement approved under (b) of this section by the commissioner, the commissioner may enforce the agreement as to lessees not a party to the agreement by allocating production under the principle of correlative rights and by apportioning costs and revenues.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 38 SLA 2010.]

The commissioner may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter for duties assigned to the department, including the promotion of maximum economic recovery.

History.

(§ 6 ch 175 SLA 1980; am §§ 6 — 9, 18 ch 38 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For drilling of geothermal wells, see 11 AAC 87, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “a geothermal system that includes state land” for “each producing geothermal system and may issue well-spacing and pooling orders, limits on production, and reinjection requirements, in order to prevent waste, promote maximum economic recovery, and protect correlative rights”; in (b), added “that includes state land” following “part of a geothermal system”; in (c), added “under (b) of this section” following “ratify a unit agreement approved”; repealed (d), which read, “Lease operations under an approved development plan or unit agreement are considered to be in compliance with individual lease requirements.”; added (e).

Sec. 41.06.035.
Reservoir management; commission’s regulations.

The commission may issue well-spacing and pooling orders, place limits on production, and impose reinjection requirements for the purpose of preventing waste and to protect correlative rights in a geothermal system.

The commission may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 and issue orders appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter for duties assigned to the commission, including orders regarding the establishment of drilling units for pools as set out in AS

31.05.100

and orders regarding unitized operation and integration of interests as set out in AS

31.05.110

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 38 SLA 2010)

Sec. 41.06.040.
Regulations; requirements; inspections.

The commission shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), issue orders, and take other appropriate action to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter, including adopting regulations to prevent

geothermal resources, water or other fluids, and gases from escaping into strata other than that in which they are found, unless in accordance with an approved reinjection program;

contamination of surface and groundwater;

premature degradation of a geothermal system by water encroachment or otherwise;

blowouts, cavings, and seepage; and

unreasonable disturbance or injury to neighboring properties, prior water rights, prior oil or gas rights, human life, health, and the natural environment.

The commission shall require the operator of a geothermal well to file an adequate individual or blanket surety bond to ensure compliance with regulations adopted under this section.

The commission shall require a geothermal operator to notify the commission if the operator discovers significant quantities of hydrocarbon substances, helium, or fissionable materials.

The commission and its staff may enter upon any property, public or private, to inspect a geothermal operation for compliance with regulations adopted under this section.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 38 SLA 2010.]

History.

(§ 6 ch 175 SLA 1980; am §§ 11 — 14, 18 ch 38 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For applicability, see 11 AAC 87, art. 1.

For exploratory operations, see 11 AAC 87, art. 2.

For drilling of geothermal wells, see 11 AAC 87, art. 3.

For production, see 11 AAC 87, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, repealed and reenacted (a); in (b), substituted “commission” for “commissioner”, “require” for “cause”, and made stylistic changes; in (c), substituted “commission” for “commissioner” and for “department” respectively; in (d), substituted “commission and its staff” for “commissioner”; repealed (e).

Sec. 41.06.050.
Permits to drill.

A person shall apply for and receive a permit from the commission before drilling a well in

search of geothermal resources; or

support of the recovery or production of geothermal resources.

The application required in (a) of this section must contain sufficient information to enable the commission to determine if the operation of the well will interfere with or impair a prior water, oil, or gas right.

A person must submit a separate permit application for each well. The permit application must be in the form or format required by the commission and include all information required by the commission.

As soon as practicable after receiving an application under (a) of this section, the commission shall approve or deny the application for a permit to drill.

In making the determination under (d) of this section, the commission shall consider whether the

proposed well will significantly interfere with or substantially impair a prior water, oil, or gas right;

proposed well is contrary to a provision of this chapter, a regulation adopted by the commission, another law, or an order, stipulation, or term of a permit issued by the commission; and

applicant is in violation of a provision of this chapter, a regulation adopted by the commission, another law, or an order, stipulation, or term of a permit issued by the commission; the commission shall consider the magnitude of the violation.

History.

(§ 6 ch 175 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 38 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For exploratory operations, see 11 AAC 87, art. 2.

For drilling of geothermal wells, see 11 AAC 87, art. 3.

For production, see 11 AAC 87, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, repealed and reenacted the section.

Sec. 41.06.055.
Regulatory cost charge for geothermal wells.

Each person that, on the first day of a state fiscal year, operates a well within the jurisdiction of the commission for which a permit to drill has been issued under AS

41.06.050

shall pay to the commission an annual regulatory charge for each well that has not, before the first day of that state fiscal year, been

plugged and abandoned; and

reported as abandoned in accordance with regulations of the commission.

The commission shall annually determine the regulatory cost charge to be paid under this section. The regulatory cost charge to be paid by a person for a state fiscal year must be based on the total volume during the most recent calendar year for the wells described in (a) of this section of which the person was the operator on the first day of the fiscal year as a percentage of the total volume during the same calendar year for all wells described in (a) of this section. In this subsection, “total volume” means the sum of the volume of all geothermal resources produced from a well and all fluids and substances injected or otherwise artificially introduced into the well.

The commission shall determine the regulatory cost charges levied under this section so that the total amount to be collected approximately equals the appropriations made for the operating costs of the commission that have been incurred under this chapter for the fiscal year.

The commission shall collect the regulatory cost charges imposed under this section. The Department of Administration shall identify the amount of appropriations made for the operating costs of the commission under this chapter that lapse into the general fund each year. The legislature may appropriate an amount that is at least equal to the lapsed amount to the commission for its operating costs under this chapter for the next fiscal year. If the legislature makes an appropriation to the commission under this subsection that is equal to or greater than the lapsed amount, the commission shall reduce the total regulatory cost charge collected for that fiscal year by a comparable amount.

The commission may adopt regulations relating to the investigation of the accuracy of reported information and for collecting required payments under this section.

History.

(§ 16 ch 38 SLA 2010)

Sec. 41.06.060.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“commercial use” means the sale of heat or power to a third party;

“commission” means the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission created under AS

31.05.005

;

“correlative rights” means the right of an owner of each property in a geothermal system to produce without waste the owner’s just and equitable share of the geothermal resources in the geothermal system; a just and reasonable share is an amount, so far as can be practically determined and so far as can be practically produced without waste, that is substantially in proportion to the quantity of recoverable geothermal resources under the owner’s property relative to the total recoverable geothermal resources in the geothermal system;

“geothermal fluid” means liquids and steam at temperatures greater than 120 degrees Celsius or any commercial use of liquids and steam naturally present in a geothermal system at temperatures less than 120 degrees Celsius;

“geothermal resources”

means the natural heat of the earth at temperatures greater than 120 degrees Celsius, or any use of that heat for commercial purposes, measured at the point where the highest-temperature resources encountered enter or contact a well or other resource extraction device or any commercial use of the natural heat of the earth;

includes

the energy, including pressure, in whatever form present in, resulting from, created by, or that may be extracted from that natural heat;

the material medium, including steam and other gases, hot water, and hot brines constituting the geothermal fluid naturally present, as well as substances artificially introduced to serve as a heat transfer medium; and

all dissolved or entrained minerals and gases that may be obtained from the material medium, but excluding hydrocarbon substances and helium;

“geothermal system” means a stratum, pool, reservoir, or other geologic formation containing geothermal resources;

“operator” means a person drilling, maintaining, operating, producing, or in control of a well;

“owner” means the person who has the right to drill into or produce from a geothermal system and to appropriate the geothermal resources produced from a geothermal system for that person and others;

“waste” means, in addition to its ordinary meaning, physical waste, and includes an inefficient, excessive, or improper production, use, or dissipation of geothermal resources, including

drilling, transporting, or storage methods that cause or tend to cause unnecessary surface loss of geothermal resources;

locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating, producing, or venting of a well in a manner that results or tends to result in reducing the ultimate economic recovery of geothermal resources;

“well” means a well drilled, converted, or reactivated for the discovery, testing, production, or subsurface injection of geothermal resources.

History.

(§ 6 ch 175 SLA 1980; am § 43 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 38 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For additional definitions, see AS

41.99.900

.

Administrative Code. —

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For drilling of geothermal wells, see 11 AAC 87, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, repealed and reenacted the section, adding the definitions of “commercial use” and “commission”, and reorganizing the definition of “geothermal resources”.